Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4002.16 of Title 56, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Director of the Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall
appoint an advisory committee to advise the Director on matters
relating to service delivery for dental care of Medicaid patients.
B. Such advisory committee shall include among its members
representatives of the Oklahoma Dental Association, dental service
organizations, and the Oklahoma Board of Dentistry.
Req. No. 16192 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16192 CMA 02/09/26





















Req. No. 16192 Page 2